apertium-fr-pt.pt.dix
    <pardef n="per/der__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deríamos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deria</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deríeis</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derias</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deriam</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deria</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deremos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derei</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dereis</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derás</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derão</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derá</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dermos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dermo</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dermos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dê</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derdes</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derde</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derdes</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deres</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dere</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deres</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derem</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derem</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dê</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dendo</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dendo</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>demos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>demo</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>demos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>destes</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deste</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>destes</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deste</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deste</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deram</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deram</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deu</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deu</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>camos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>camo</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>camos</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cam</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cam</l>
          <r>der<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      

      <e lm="perder">
        <i>per</i>
        <par n="per/der__vblex"/>
      </e>
